Washington statutes.
RCW 35.18.120

City manager—Removal—Resolution and notice.

The city manager shall be appointed for an indefinite term and may be removed by a majority vote of the council.

At least thirty days before the effective date of his or her removal, the city manager must be furnished with a formal statement in the form of a resolution passed by a majority vote of the city council stating the council's intention to remove him or her and the reasons therefor. Upon passage of the resolution stating the council's intention to remove the manager, the council by a similar vote may suspend him or her from duty, but his or her pay shall continue until his or her removal becomes effective.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2026; 1965 c 7 s 35.18.120. Prior: 1955 c 337 s 17; prior: 1943 c 271 s 14, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9198-23, part.]